apertium-kaa.kaa.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!   K A R A K A L P A K · M O R P H O L O G I C A L · T R A N S D U C E R   !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

! See http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Turkic_lexicon

Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>         ! Noun                       ! Atlıq
%<np%>        ! Proper noun                ! Menshiklik atlıq
%<adj%>       ! Adjective                  ! Kelbetlik
%<num%>       ! Numeral                    ! Sam
%<prn%>       ! Pronoun                    ! Есімдік
%<det%>       ! Determiner                 ! Дeтeрминaтив
%<v%>         ! Verb                       ! Етістік
%<vaux%>      ! Auxilary verb              ! Көмeкші eтістік
%<adv%>       ! Adverb                     ! Үстeу
%<post%>      ! Postposition               ! Сeптeулік шылaу
%<postadv%>   ! Postadverb                 ! "Пoстүстeу" (*1)
%<cnjcoo%>    ! Co-ordinating conjunction  ! Caлaлaстырғыш жaлғaулық
%<cnjsub%>    ! Sub-ordinating conjunction ! Caбaқтaстырғыш жaлғaулық
%<cnjadv%>    ! Adverbial conjunction      ! "Үстeу-жaлғaулық"
%<ij%>        ! Interjection               ! Одaғaй
%<abbr%>      ! Abbreviation               ! Қысқaрғaн сөз
%<cop%>       ! Copula                     ! Кoпулa
%<ideo%>      ! Ideophone                  ! Еліктeу сөз
%<paren%>     ! Вводное слово
%<phrase%>
%<top%>       ! Toponym      ! Тoпoним
%<ant%>       ! Anthroponym  ! Кісі eсімі
%<cog%>       ! Cognomen     ! Фaмилия
%<pat%>       ! Patronym     ! Әкe тeкті eсім
%<org%>       ! Organization ! Ұйым eсімі
%<al%>        ! Other        ! Бaсқaлaр
%<m%>         ! Masculine
%<f%>         ! Feminine
%<mf%>        ! Masculine/feminine !# basically cognoms without -oв/-oвa,
%<attr%>      ! Attributive
%<subst%>     ! Substantive
%<advl%>      ! Adverbial
%<sg%>        ! Singular
%<pl%>        ! Plural
%<px1sg%>     ! First person singular
%<px2sg%>     ! Second person singular
%<px3sp%>     ! Third person singular/plural
%<px1pl%>     ! First person plural
%<px2pl%>     ! Second person plural
%<px%>        ! General possessive          !# -нікі
%<nom%>       ! Nominative
%<gen%>       ! Genitive
%<dat%>       ! Dative
%<acc%>       ! Accusative
%<abl%>       ! Ablative
%<loc%>       ! Locative
%<ins%>       ! Instrumental
%<sim%>       ! Similative
%<abe%>       ! Abessive=Privative ! Лишитeльный
%<reas%>      ! not used rigth now, just in case for
%<comp%>      ! Comparative
%<pers%>      ! Personal
%<recip%>     ! Reciprocal
%<dem%>       ! Demonstrative
%<ind%>       ! Indefinite
%<itg%>       ! Interrogative
%<qnt%>       ! Quantifier
%<neg%>       ! Negative       !# eшкім
%<ref%>       ! Reflexive
%<ord%>       ! Ordinal
%<coll%>      ! Collective
%<dist%>      ! Distributive
%<imp%>       ! Imperative
%<opt%>       ! Optative/jussive
%<caus%>      ! Causative
%<pass%>      ! Passive
%<coop%>      ! Cooperative
%<pres%>      ! for "жaтыр", "тұр", "oтыр" and "жүр"
%<aor%>       ! -{E}
%<past%>      ! -{G}{A}н
%<ifi%>       ! -{D}{I}
%<evid%>      ! Evidential, a.k.a. "indirect" / non-eyewitness / hearsay 
%<ifi_evid%>  ! -{I}пт{I}
%<fut%>       ! -{I}р
%<fut_plan%>  ! -{M}{A}{K}
%<prog%>      ! -{M}{A}{K}t{A}         ! only takes 3rd person, not the only progressive construction
%<prc_perf%>  ! Perfect participle
%<prc_impf%>  ! Imperfect participle
%<prc_vol%>   ! Volition participle
%<prc_cond%>  ! Conditional participle
%<prc_fplan%> ! Future plan participle
%<prc_plan%>  ! Plan participle
%<gna_perf%>  ! -{I}п
%<gna_cond%>  ! -с{A}
%<gna_until%> ! -{G}{A}нш{A}
%<gna_after%> ! -{G}{A}л{I}
%<gpr_past%>  ! -{G}{A}н               ! past verbal adjective
%<gpr_impf%>  ! -{E}{T}{I}н            ! imperfect verbal adjective
%<gpr_pot%>   ! -{U}ш{I}               ! potential verbal adjective
%<gpr_ppot%>  ! -{A}рл{I}{K}
%<gpr_fut%>   ! -{A}r                  ! future verbal adjective
%<ger%>       ! -{U}
%<ger_past%>  ! -{G}{A}н
%<ger_perf%>  ! -{G}{A}нл{I}{K}   (stresses the fact that something happened)
%<ger_ppot%>  ! -{A}рл{I}{K}      (~the ability to do the denoted action)
%<ger_abs%>   ! -уш{I}л{I}{K}          FIXME CHECK
%<ger_fut%>   ! -{A}р
%<ger_impf%>  ! -{E}{T}{I}н
%<tv%>        ! Transitive
%<iv%>        ! Intransitive
%<p1%>        ! First person
%<p2%>        ! Second person
%<p3%>        ! Third person
%<frm%>       ! Formality
%<percent%>   ! Percent
%<qst%>       ! Modal question particle
%<emph%>      ! Emphasizing modal particle
%<mod%>       ! Other modal words (шығaр, сияқты etc)
%<sent%>      ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>      ! Hyphen
%<cm%>        ! Comma
%<apos%>      ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>     ! Quote marker (right hand side)
%<lquot%>     ! Quote marker (left hand side)
%<rpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
%<lpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)

%{E%}
%{A%}
%{I%}
%{N%}
%{M%}
%{G%}
%{K%}
%{D%}

%{s%}
%{n%}
%{l%}
%{y%}
!%{ъ%}    ! turns to ' sometimes

%{а%}
%{э%}
!%{с%}
!%{з%}

%{й%}
%{л%}
%{н%}
%{з%}
!%{т%}
%{с%}

%{❗%}    ! blocks normal phon stuff, like fronting harmony
%{ь%}    ! forces front harmony
%{ꙑ%}    ! forces back harmony

%>
%  
%-
%'
%~
%+
%,
%.

LEXICON Root

Miscellaneous ; 
Conjunctions ; 
Postadverbs ;
Copula ;
Postpositions ;
Pronouns ;
Determiners ;
Numerals ;
Nouns ;
ProperNouns ;
Adjectives ;
Adverbs ;
Verbs ;
Interjections ; 
Abbreviations ; 
Punctuation ; 
Digits ; ! Use/Circ

Common ;

!! Interface
!! =========

!! Verbs, nouns, adjectives, adverbs
!! ---------------------------------

LEXICON V-IV
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER ;

LEXICON V-IV-COOP
V-IV ;

LEXICON V-IV-REFL
V-IV ;

LEXICON V-IV-REP
V-IV ;

LEXICON V-IV-LESS
V-IV ;

LEXICON V-TV
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-TV-CAUS
V-TV ;

LEXICON V-TV-COOP
V-TV ;

LEXICON V-TV-REP
V-TV ;

LEXICON VAUX
Vinfl-AUX ;

LEXICON N1
%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON N1-NAT
N1 ;

LEXICON N1-VN
N1 ;

LEXICON A1            
%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                             
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}r%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ; !CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   
%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;                             
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}r%{A%}%{K%} SUBST ;   
%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! COMMON-CLITICS ;                               
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<advl%>:%>%{I%}r%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ; !COMMON-CLITICS ;     

LEXICON A1-SUP
A1 ;

LEXICON A1-NAT
A1-NAT ;

LEXICON A2
%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                             !# eскі дoс
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}r%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   !# eскірeк заманда
%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;                             !# "Ол eскіні eртeдeн eсіндe сақтаған, жаңаның жалынды жаршысы бoлған ақын."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}r%{A%}%{K%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;   !# "Ихтимал, бу бина башкасы, искeрәгe урынында утырадыр."

LEXICON A2-SUP
A2 ;

LEXICON A2-NAT
A2 ;

LEXICON ADV
%<adv%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON ADV-ATTR
ADV-WITH-KI ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI
ADV ;
%<adv%>: KI ;

!! Other
!! -----

LEXICON POST
%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON POST-NOM
POST ;

LEXICON POST-ABL
POST ;

LEXICON POSTADV
%<postadv%>: # ;

LEXICON CS
%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON CA
%<cnjadv%>: CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON ADV-ITG
%<adv%>%<itg%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON CC
%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON QST
%<qst%>: # ;

LEXICON MOD
! шығар, сияқты etc.
%<mod%>: # ;

LEXICON IJ
INTERJ ;

LEXICON IJ→IJ
IJ ;

LEXICON INTERJ
%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON ABBR
%<abbr%>: # ; 

LEXICON IDEO
%<ideo%>: # ;

LEXICON PAREN
%<paren%>: # ;

LEXICON PHRASE
%<phrase%>: # ;

!==============================================================================!
!
!                               N U M E R A L S
!
!    WARNING: This section should not be modified without consultation.
!             !Test cases are in dev/numerals.
!==============================================================================!

 LEXICON Postpositions
arqalı:arqalı POST-NOM ; ! ""
berli:berli POST ; ! ""
boyı% menen:boyı% menen POST ; ! ""
jóninde:jóninde POST ; ! ""
qaramaǵında:qaramaǵında POST ; ! ""
keyinirek:keyinirek POST ; ! "" FIXME not sure if its POST
shama% menen:shama% menen POST ; ! ""
men:%{M%}enen POST ; ! "with" + NOM ! Dir/LR
 LEXICON Nouns
kiyiz:kiyiz N1 ; ! ""
tereńlik:tereńlik N1 ; ! ""
 LEXICON Adjectives
qashıq:qashıq A1 ; ! ""
kúngi:kúngi A2 ; ! ""
ullı:ullı A1 ; ! ""
dos:dos A2 ; ! ""
 LEXICON Adverbs
alǵa:alǵa ADV ; ! ""
eń:eń ADV ; ! ""
sonshelli:sonshelli ADV ; ! ""
arı%-beri:arı%-beri ADV ; ! ""
qayda:qayda ADV-ITG ; ! "where (гдe;кудa)"
qalay:qalay ADV-ITG ; ! "how"
qashan:qashan ADV-ITG ; ! "when"
ne:ne ADV-ITG ; ! "what" Use/MT
bıyıl:bıyıl ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "this year > this year's"
burın:burın ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "earlier"
bıltır:bıltır ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "last year > last year's"
endi:endi ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "contrastive now > the one now"
keyin:keyin ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "after"   FIXME: takes comparative
kesh:kesh ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "evening/late"
tań% erteń:tań% erteń ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "morning"
 LEXICON Verbs
jaqınlas:jaqınlas V-IV ; ! ""
bóleklen:bóleklen V-IV ; ! ""
basqa:basqa POST-ABL ; ! ""
jamıl:jamıl V-TV ; ! ""
tańla:tańla V-TV ; ! ""
ur:ur V-TV ; ! ""
LEXICON Common
а:а CC ;
а:а QST ;
aǵarańla:aǵarańla V-IV-LESS ;
ayrıl:ayrıl V-IV ;
aytpaqshı:aytpaqshı PAREN ;
aqırı%-ayaǵında:aqırı%-ayaǵında ADV ;
al:al CC ;
al:al VAUX ;
alaqay:alaqay IJ ;
alban:alban N1-NAT ;
aldastır:aldastır V-TV-REP ;
aljıǵır:aljıǵır IJ ;
alıs:alıs N1-VN ;
ana%-mına:ana%-mına PHRASE ;
ap%-awır:ap%-awır A2-SUP ;
appaq:appaq A2-SUP ;
apuw:apuw N1-VN ;
arapsha:arapsha A1-NAT ;
arı:arı ADV-ATTR ;
arqalı:arqalı POST-NOM ;
arqılı:arqılı POST-NOM ;
arman:arman POST-ABL ;
ars%-ars:ars%-ars IDEO ;
arı:arı ADV-ATTR ;
aslam:aslam POST-ABL ;
assalawma:assalawma IJ→IJ ;
astarlat:astarlat V-TV-CAUS ;
atas:atas V-TV-COOP ;
atlanıs:atlanıs N1-VN ;
atpala:atpala V-IV-REP ;
atıs:atıs N1-VN ;
awa:awa IJ ;
awdarıs:awdarıs N1-VN ;
awqatlanıs:awqatlanıs V-IV-COOP ;
afrikan:afrikan N1-NAT ;
ashılıs:ashılıs N1-VN ;
ábzál:ábzál A1-SUP ;
áger:áger CC ;
ádep:ádep ADV-ATTR ;
ájimli:ájimli A2 ;
áytewir:áytewir ADV ;
álbette:álbette PAREN ;
árebi:árebi A2-NAT ;
áttegene:áttegene IJ ;
awel:awel ADV-ATTR ;
áhá:áhá IJ ;
ba:ba QST ;
baǵana:baǵana ADV-ATTR ;
baǵana:baǵana ADV-ATTR ;
baj%-baj:baj%-baj IDEO ;
baqılawshı:baqılawshı N1 ;
basqar:basqar V-TV ;
bay%-bay:bay%-bay IJ ;
bawlıqsız:bawlıqsız A1 ;
bekkemles:bekkemles V-TV-COOP ;
belgilet:belgilet V-TV-CAUS ;
biyles:biyles V-IV-COOP ;
bılshılda:bılshılda V-IV ;
bókterin:bókterin V-IV-REFL ;
de:de CC ; ! "" ! DIR/LR
diktor:diktor N1-NAT ;
dińkildek:dińkildek N1 ;
dúziw:dúziw A2 ;
eletkiz:eletkiz V-TV-CAUS ;
emin%-erkin:emin%-erkin A1 ;
enshiles:enshiles V-TV-COOP ;
ǵamla:ǵamla V-TV ;
gruzin:gruzin N1-NAT ;
isletil:isletil V-TV-CAUS ;
iyteris:iyteris V-TV-COOP ;
ılaslan:ılaslan V-IV-REFL ;
ıńıldas:ıńıldas V-IV-COOP ;
jalǵa:jalǵa V-IV ;
jırtıl:jırtıl V-IV-REFL ;
jolıǵıs:jolıǵıs V-IV-COOP ;
juwıs:juwıs V-TV-COOP ;
kánekey:kánekey IJ ;
karta:karta N1 ;
kesirlen:kesirlen V-TV ;
kóliksiz:kóliksiz A1 ;
kooperativlestir:kooperativlestir V-TV-CAUS ;
litvalı:litvalı A2 ;
locman:locman N1-NAT ;
mıńqılda:mıńqılda V-IV ;
mırjıqlan:mırjıqlan V-IV-REFL ;
ojırayıs:ojırayıs V-IV-COOP ;
ol%-bul:ol%-bul PHRASE ;
onı%-munı:onı%-munı PHRASE ;
pálen%-tólen:pálen%-tólen PHRASE ;
parsı:parsı N1-NAT ;
payan:payan N1 ;
putaqlan:putaqlan V-IV-REFL ;
qada:qada V-TV ;
qanday:qanday ADV-ITG ;
qapıl:qapıl ADV ;
qaqshıyt:qaqshıyt V-TV-CAUS ;
qay:qay A1 ;
qıltıldas:qıltıldas V-TV-COOP ;
qıyınlan:qıyınlan V-IV-REFL ;
qıyıs:qıyıs V-IV-COOP ;
qubır%-gubir:qubır%-gubir V-IV ;
quyaqqı:quyaqqı A2 ;
saltańla:saltańla V-TV ;
shiginlen:shiginlen V-IV-REFL ;
shımshıs:shımshıs V-IV-COOP ;
shıp%-shımır:shıp%-shımır A2-SUP ;
shólistan:shólistan N1 ;
shuqırayt:shuqırayt V-TV-CAUS ;
shúykildes:shúykildes V-TV-COOP ;
slavyan:slavyan N1-NAT ;
soń:soń POST-NOM ;
taqlan:taqlan V-IV-REFL ;
tara:tara V-IV ;
tilkimles:tilkimles V-IV-COOP ;
túnes:túnes V-TV-COOP ;
úrkit:úrkit V-TV-CAUS ;
uyqasımsız:uyqasımsız A1 ;
way:way IJ ;
zerdeli:zerdeli A2 ;
